Utah statutes.
75-5-421.   Recording of conservator's letters.
Letters of conservatorship are evidence of transfer of all assets of a
protected person to the conservator. An order terminating a conservatorship is
evidence of transfer of all assets of the estate from the conservator to the
protected person or his successors. Subject to the requirements of general
statutes governing the filing or recordation of documents of title to land or
other property, letters of conservatorship and orders terminating
conservatorships may be filed or recorded to give record notice of title as
between the conservator and the protected person.
